Utah statutes.
75-3-202.   Appointment or testacy proceedings -- Conflicting claim of
domicile in another state.
If conflicting claims as to the domicile of a decedent are made in a formal
testacy or appointment proceeding commenced in this state, and in a testacy or
appointment proceeding after notice pending at the same time in another state,
the court of this state must stay, dismiss, or permit suitable amendment in,
the proceeding here unless it is determined that the local proceeding was
commenced before the proceeding elsewhere. The determination of domicile in
the proceeding first commenced must be accepted as determinative in the formal
testacy or appointment proceeding in this state.
